Oklahoma, session 2026, SB458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 326, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 326. A. In addition to the special sessions for


equalizing assessments, and all other special sessions now provided


by law, the county commissioners shall meet and hold sessions for


the transaction of business in the county courthouse, at the county


seat, on or before the first Monday of each month, and may remain in


session as long as the public business may require, and the passing


upon, allowing or rejecting of bills against the county shall be

Req. No. 714 Page 1


taken up and passed upon by the board in the order in which the


claims have been filed, and in which order such claims must be


entered upon the calendar, except salary, wage and compensation


claims of officers and deputies and employees, which salary, wage


and compensation claims may be considered and paid, on or after the


termination of the service pay period; provided, that such claims by


subordinate deputies and employees be first approved by the officer


having charge of the office or department. The board of county


commissioners may recess or adjourn its meetings within the session,


either from time to time or from day to day, or on call of the


chairman chair; but, if such board does not sooner adjourn its


session for any month, such session shall terminate and be adjourned


by operation of law on the last business day of such month. If the


board shall have adjourned its session before the last business day


of any month, the county clerk shall have power to call special


sessions when the best interests of the county demand it, upon


giving five (5) days’ notice of the time and object of calling the


commissioners together, by posting up notices in three public places


in the county, or by publication in some newspaper of general


circulation in the county; provided, that in the case of a vacancy


in the office of county clerk, the chairman chair of the board shall


have power to call a special session for the purpose of filling such


vacancy.



Req. No. 714 Page 2


B. The board of county commissioners may meet at times and in


places within the county other than the county courthouse if it is


determined that such meetings are beneficial to the general public.


Such meetings shall be in compliance with the Oklahoma Open Meeting


Act.


C. County commissioners may discuss administrative,


operational, and procedural matters of the board, even when a quorum


of the board is present, provided that the discussion does not


address the appropriation of county funds, except as provided for in


subsection F of this section, and the board takes no official


action. Such discussion shall not be subject to the provisions of


the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act. Such discussion shall be limited to:


1. The scheduling of agenda items to be set before the board of


county commissioners for an emergency, regular, or special meeting;


2. Public and media statements;


3. Organizational structure;


4. Internal processes;


5. Staffing needs; and


6. The receipt of reports from county employees.


D. County commissioners may conduct regular meetings with


county employees which discuss the management of the county. Such


meetings shall not be subject to the provisions of the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act.



Req. No. 714 Page 3


E. Any number of county commissioners may attend and


participate in conferences; training; and educational, press, and


social events, even if a quorum is present at such event. The


county commissioners may discuss the business of the county at such


event, provided that the board takes no official action.


F. In counties that have a county budget board as provided in


Section 1407 of this title, county commissioners and other elected


officials of the county may discuss budgetary matters, provided that


a quorum of the county budget board is not present and the board


takes no official action.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 304, as last


amended by Section 3, Chapter 237, O.S.L. 2024 (25 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 304), is amended to read as follows:


Section 304. As used in the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act:


1. “Public body” means the governing bodies of all


municipalities located within this state, boards of county


commissioners of the counties in this state, boards of public and


higher education in this state and all boards, bureaus, commissions,


agencies, trusteeships, authorities, councils, committees, public


trusts or any entity created by a public trust including any


committee or subcommittee composed of any of the members of a public


trust or other legal entity receiving funds from the Rural Economic


Action Plan Fund as authorized by Section 2007 of Title 62 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, task forces or study groups in this state

Req. No. 714 Page 4


supported in whole or in part by public funds or entrusted with the


expending of public funds, or administering public property, and


shall include all committees or subcommittees of any public body.


Public body shall not include:


a. the state judiciary,


b. the Council on Judicial Complaints when conducting,


discussing, or deliberating any matter relating to a


complaint received or filed with the Council,


c. the Legislature, or


d. administrative staffs of public bodies including, but


not limited to, faculty meetings and athletic staff


meetings of institutions of higher education when


those staffs are not meeting with the public body, or


entry-year assistance committees. Furthermore, public


body shall not include the,


e. multidisciplinary teams provided for in Section 1-9-


102 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, in Section


10-115 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, and in


subsection C of Section 1-502.2 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes or any school board meeting for the


sole purpose of considering recommendations of a


multidisciplinary team and deciding the placement of


any child who is the subject of the recommendations.


Furthermore, public body shall not include,

Req. No. 714 Page 5


f. meetings conducted by stewards designated by the


Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission pursuant to Section


203.4 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes when the


stewards are officiating at races or otherwise


enforcing rules of the Commission. Furthermore,


public body shall not include,


g. the board of directors of a Federally Qualified Health


Center or the postadjudication review boards provided


for in Sections 1116.2 and 1116.3 of Title 10 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, or


h. boards of county commissioners for the purposes set


forth in Section 326 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


2. “Meeting” means the conduct of business of a public body by


a majority of its members being personally together or, as


authorized by Section 307.1 of this title, together pursuant to a


videoconference. Meeting shall not include informal gatherings of a


majority of the members of the public body when no business of the


public body is discussed;


3. “Regularly scheduled meeting” means a meeting at which the


regular business of the public body is conducted;


4. “Special meeting” means any meeting of a public body other


than a regularly scheduled meeting or emergency meeting;



Req. No. 714 Page 6


5. “Emergency meeting” means any meeting called for the purpose


of dealing with an emergency. For purposes of the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act, an emergency is defined as a situation involving injury


to persons or injury and damage to public or personal property or


immediate financial loss when the time requirements for public


notice of a special meeting would make such procedure impractical


and increase the likelihood of injury or damage or immediate


financial loss;


6. “Continued or reconvened meeting” means a meeting which is


assembled for the purpose of finishing business appearing on an


agenda of a previous meeting. For the purposes of the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act, only matters on the agenda of the previous meeting at


which the announcement of the continuance is made may be discussed


at a continued or reconvened meeting;


7. “Videoconference” means a conference among members of a


public body remote from one another who are linked by interactive


telecommunication devices or technology, and/or or technology


permitting both visual and auditory communication between and among


members of the public body and/or or between and among members of


the public body and members of the public. During any


videoconference, both the visual and auditory communications


functions shall attempt to be utilized; and


8. “Teleconference” means a conference among members of a


public body remote from one another who are linked by

Req. No. 714 Page 7


telecommunication devices and/or or technology permitting auditory


communication between and among members of the public body and/or or


between and among members of the public body and members of the


public.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-714 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:36:46 AM



































Req. No. 714 Page 8